src/morphology/stems/interjections.lexc
LEXICON Interjection
a aj "o" # ;
agh aj "ugh" # ;
aha aj "aha" # ;
ass aj "how" # ;
assa aj "how" # ;
avond aj "avaunt, begone" # ;
awotta aj "behold" # ;
ay aj "hey, hi" # ;
dar aj "what, eh, why" # ;
darwar aj "beware" # ;
ehan aj "alas" # ;
ellas aj "alas" # ;
farawel aj "farewell" # ;
farwel aj "farewell" # ;
fi aj "fie" # ;
go aj "woe" # ;
gwev aj "woe to him" # ;
ha aj "ha" # ;
harow aj "help" # ;
hayl aj "hail" # ;
hedj aj "stop, halt" # ;
ho aj "stop, halt" # ;
hou aj "hello" # ;
knakk aj "snap" # ;
mal aj "pest" # ;
malbew aj "plague take" # ;
na aj "no" # ;
ogh aj "oh, alas" # ;
ott aj "see, behold, lo" # ;
otta aj "behold" # ;
ottavy aj "behold me" # ;
ottajy aj "behold thee" # ;
ottava aj "behold him" # ;
ottahi aj "behold her" # ;
ottani aj "behold us" # ;
ottahwi aj "behold you" # ;
ottensi aj "behold them" # ;
ottensa aj "see there" # ;
ottomma aj "see here" # ;
out aj "out, oh" # ;
pes aj "peace!" # ;
prouyt aj "(call to cattle)" # ;
soweth aj "alas" # ;
tetivali aj "nonsense, tut-tut" # ;
tru aj "woe" # ;
wel aj "well" # ;
ya aj "yes" # ;
ye aj "yes" # ;
